Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.320

Fireworks.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the possession, sale, or use of fireworks when possessed, sold, or used in compliance with chapter 70.77 RCW.

[ 1994 c 133 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 133: See notes following RCW 70.77.146.